lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/g.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Sg +Pl +Symbol

LEXICON Root

nouns ;
symbols ;

LEXICON nouns
dog m ;
boat m ;
< c a t > # ;

LEXICON m
< "+Sg":0 > # ;
< "+Pl":s > # ;

LEXICON symbols
< %\ %+Symbol:0 > # ;
< £ %+Symbol:0 > # ;
